District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

44-633

Assessments on hospitals.

Expired.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5014, 57 DCR 6242
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 512, 58 DCR 1008
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 8182, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 111, 59 DCR 6190

History

D.C. Law 18-370, in subsec. (a)(2), substituted “$2,000” for “$1,500”.
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (a)(2), substituted “For fiscal year 2011, $2,529 per licensed bed and for fiscal years 2012 through 2014, $3,788 per licensed bed, ” for “For fiscal years 2011 through 2014, $1,500 per licensed bed,”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 19-21 which did not affect this section as codified.

Effect of Amendments

Section 1104 of D.C. Law 18-222 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 1104. Assessments on hospitals.
“(a) Each hospital in the District of Columbia shall pay to the Mayor an annual assessment as follows:
“(1) For fiscal year 2010, $500 per licensed bed, which shall be paid by September 1, 2010, and which shall be deposited in the Medical Liability Captive Trust Fund, established by section 12 of the District of Columbia Medical Liability Captive Insurance Agency Establishment Act of 2008, effective July 18, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-196; D.C. Official Code § 1-307.91), to be used for the purposes of this fund.
“(2) For fiscal years 2011 through 2014, $1,500 per licensed bed, which shall be paid based on a schedule determined by the Mayor and which shall be deposited in the Hospital Fund, established by section 1103 to be used for the purpose of this fund.
“(b) The Chief Financial Officer may determine the manner in which payments are to be made under this act, including whether payments owed by each hospital pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be paid electronically.”
Section 2002(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1104 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5014 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 1104 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 512 of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 511 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided that subtitle B of title V of the act may be cited as “Hospital Assessment Amendment Act of 2010”.

Short title: Section 8181 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle S of title VIII of the act may be cited as “Hospital Assessment Amendment Act of 2011”.

Short Title

Section 513 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided: “Sec. 513. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2010.”

Editor's Notes